Connecticut, session 2026, HB05175.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of ____ dollars be appropriated to the Department of
Revenue Services, from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, for the purpose of hiring fifty additional in-house auditors to
assist in the closing of the state's tax gap by collecting taxes and
assessing penalties and interest as applicable.